Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.130

Codification of ordinances.

Compilation, codification, and revision of code city ordinances shall be as provided by and be governed by the provisions of RCW 35.21.500 through 35.21.570.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.130.]